Louisiana, session 2026, SB254.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 52 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3081 and 3082, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 52. DEBIT CARD SURCHARGE
§3081. Debit card surcharge; prohibiting certain excess fees; liability;
definitions
A. As used in this Chapter:
(1) "Cardholder" means the person named on the face of a debit card to
whom or for whose benefit the debit card is issued by an issuer and includes any
employee or other agent or authorized user of the card.
(2) "Debit card" means a card or other payment device that debits funds
directly from a cardholder's deposit account.
(3) "Retail business" means any person or entity engaged in the sale of
goods or services.
(4) "Surcharge" means any additional amount of money imposed at the
time of the transaction by a retail business that increases the charge to the
cardholder for the privilege of using a debit card.
B. In a sale of goods or services, a retail business shall not impose a
surcharge on a cardholder who uses a debit card instead of cash, check, credit
card, or any other similar means of payment.
C.(1) A retail business that violates the provisions of this Section shall be
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 254 ENROLLED
liable to the cardholder for actual damages incurred as a result of the violation.
(2) Prior to filing a civil action, a cardholder shall provide written notice
of the alleged violation to the retail business. If the retail business cures the
violation and reimburses the cardholder for any surcharge assessed within
thirty days after receipt of written notice, no private right of action shall arise
from the alleged violation.
(3) A private right of action pursuant to this Section shall apply only to
willful violations, repeated violations, or violations that are not cured within the
time period provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(4) Nothing in this Section shall limit the authority of the attorney
general to enforce the provisions of this Chapter pursuant to R.S. 51:3082.
§3082. Enforcement; penalties; reporting
A.(1) The attorney general may bring a civil action against a retail
business that violates the provisions of this Chapter.
(2) If a court of competent jurisdiction grants judgment or injunctive
relief to the attorney general, the court shall award the attorney general
reasonable attorney fees, court costs, and investigative costs.
(3) A person who violates an administrative order or court order issued
for a violation of this Section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than
five hundred dollars for each violation. A civil penalty may be imposed in any
civil action brought by the attorney general.
(4) All monies received from the payment of a fine or civil penalty
imposed and collected pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall be used
by the attorney general to promote consumer protection and education.
B. The attorney general shall establish and maintain a toll-free telephone
number and an electronic reporting system for cardholders to report an
unlawful surcharge on a debit card.
C. Any cardholder who is assessed a surcharge in violation of this
Chapter for the use of a debit card may submit a complaint to the attorney
general through the toll-free number or electronic reporting system established
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 254 ENROLLED
pursuant to Subsection B of this Section. The complaint shall include all of the
following information:
(1) The name and address of the retail business.
(2) The date and amount of the transaction.
(3) The amount of the surcharge imposed.
(4) Any receipt, invoice, or other documentation evidencing the
surcharge.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.